Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-503
Secretary of State; bills passed over Governor's veto; authentication.

Whenever any bill which shall have passed the Legislature shall be returned by the Governor with his objections thereto, and upon reconsideration shall pass the Legislature by the constitutional majority, it shall be authenticated as having become a law by a certificate thereon to the following effect: This bill having been returned by the Governor, with his objections thereto, and, after reconsideration, having passed the Legislature by the constitutional majority, it has become a law this .......... day of ........, A.D., ....., which, being signed by the presiding officer of the Legislature, shall be deemed a sufficient authentication thereof, and the bill shall thereupon be deposited with the laws in the office of the Secretary of State.

Laws 1877, § 6, p. 196;

R.S.1913, § 5570;

C.S.1922, § 4874;

C.S.1929, § 84-502;

Laws 1939, c. 136, § 1, p. 582;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 84-502;

R.S.1943, § 84-503.